West Virginia, session 2026, SB906.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STANDARDS AND SCHEDULES. §60A-2-201. Authority of Board of Pharmacy; recommendations to Legislature. (a) The Board of Pharmacy shall administer the provisions of this chapter. It shall also, on the first day of each regular legislative session, recommend to the Legislature which substances should be added to or deleted from the schedules of controlled substances contained in this article or reschedule therein. The Board of Pharmacy shall also have the authority between regular legislative sessions, on an emergency basis, to add to or delete from the schedules of controlled substances contained in this article or reschedule such substances based upon the recommendations and approval of the federal food, drug and cosmetic agency, and shall report such actions on the first day of the regular legislative session immediately following said actions.In making any such recommendation regarding a substance, the Board of Pharmacy shall consider the following factors:(1) The actual or relative potential for abuse;(2) The scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if known;(3) The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance;(4) The history and current pattern of abuse;(5) The scope, duration and significance of abuse;(6) The potential of the substance to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability; and(7) Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this article.(b) After considering the factors enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, the Board of Pharmacy shall make findings with respect to the substance under consideration. If it finds that any substance not already controlled under any schedule has a potential for abuse, it shall recommend to the Legislature that the substance be added to the appropriate schedule. If it finds that any substance already controlled under any schedule should be rescheduled or deleted, it shall so recommend to the Legislature.(c) If the Board of Pharmacy designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances which are precursors of the controlled precursor shall not be subject to control solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor.(d) If any substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal laws and notice thereof is given to the Board of Pharmacy, the board shall recommend similar control of such substance to the Legislature, specifically stating that such recommendation is based on federal action and the reasons why the federal government deemed such action necessary and proper.(e) The authority vested in the board by subsection (a) of this section shall not extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco as those terms are defined or used in other chapters of this code nor to any nonnarcotic substance if such substance may under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and the law of this state lawfully be sold over the counter without a prescription.(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the sale, wholesale, distribution, or prescribing of a cannabidiol or nabiximols in a product approved by the Food and Drug Administration is permitted and shall be placed on the schedule or descheduled as provided for by the Drug Enforcement Administration.(g) Notwithstanding §60A-2-204(d) of this code, if a drug that contains, an organic psilocybin substance or the pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin, is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and rescheduled by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration it shall be lawful to prescribe, distribute, and market based upon the recommendations of the United States Food and Drug Administration. §60A-2-204. Schedule I. (a) Schedule I shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.(b) Opiates.Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl(N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-phenylacetamide);Acetylmethadol;Allylprodine;Alphacetylmethadol (except levoalphacetylmethadol also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM); Alphameprodine; Alphamethadol; Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(( propanilido) piperidine); Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-phenylpropanamide); Benzethidine; Betacetylmethadol; Beta-hydroxyfentanyl(N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other name: N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); Betameprodine; Betamethadol; Betaprodine;Brorphine (1-(1-(1-(4-bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-one); Clonitazene; Dextromoramide; Diampromide; Diethylthiambutene; Difenoxin; Dimenoxadol; Dimepheptanol; Dimethylthiambutene; Dioxaphetyl butyrate; Dipipanone; Ethylmethylthiambutene; Etonitazene; Etoxeridine; Fentanyl analog or derivative, as that term is defined in article one of this chapter: Provided, That fentanyl and carfentanil remains a Schedule II substance, as set forth in §60A-2-206 of this code; Furethidine; Hydroxypethidine; Ketobemidone; Levomoramide; Levophenacylmorphan; 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); 3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-phenylpropanamide); Morpheridine; N-Methylnorfentanyl (N-(1-Methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenyl-propanamide, monohydrochloride); MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine); Noracymethadol; Norlevorphanol; Normethadone; Norpipanone; Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide); PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine); Phenadoxone; Phenampromide; Phenomorphan; Phenoperidine; Piritramide; Proheptazine; Properidine; Propiram; Racemoramide; Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide); Tilidine; Trimeperidine. (c) Opium derivatives. Acetorphine; Acetyldihydrocodeine; Benzylmorphine; Codeine methylbromide; Codeine-N-Oxide; Cyprenorphine; Desomorphine; Dihydromorphine; Drotebanol; Etorphine (except HCl Salt); Heroin; Hydromorphinol; Methyldesorphine; Methyldihydromorphine; Morphine methylbromide; Morphine methylsulfonate; Morphine-N-Oxide; Myrophine; Nicocodeine; Nicomorphine; Normorphine; Pholcodine; Thebacon. (d) Hallucinogenic substances.Alpha-ethyltryptamine; some trade or other names: etryptamine; Monase; alpha-ethy-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2- aminobutyl) indole; alpha-ET; and AET;1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-methylpropan-2-amine (other names: para-methoxymethamphetamine, PMMA);4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo- 2,5-DMA; 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine; some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha- desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, Nexus; N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. The substance has the acronym 25B-NBOMe; 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) ethanamine (25C-NBOMe); 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) ethanamine (25I-NBOMe); 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA; 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphet-amine; some trade or other names: DOET; 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (other name: 2C-T-7); 4-methoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine; PMA; 3-Hydoxy-phencyclidine (other name hydroxy PCP); 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine; 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP"; 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine; 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA); 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as ( ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA); N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as ( hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and ( hydroxy MDA); 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine; 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT); Alpha-methyltryptamine (other name: AMT); Bufotenine; some trade and other names: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole;3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl) -5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N- dimethyltryptamine; mappine; Diethyltryptamine; sometrade and other names: N, N-Diethyltryptamine; DET; Dimethyltryptamine; some trade or other names: DMT; 5-Methoxy-N,N-disopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT); Ibogaine; some trade and other names: 7-Ethyl-6, 6 Beta, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5H- pyrido [1’, 2’: 1, 2] azepino [5,4-b] indole; Tabernanthe iboga; Lysergic acid diethylamide; Marihuana; Marijuana (Cannabis, sp.); Mescaline; Parahexyl-7374; some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl -1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo [b,d] pyran; Synhexyl; Peyote; meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, immediate derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or extracts; N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; Psilocybin; except as provided for in §60A-2-201(g) of this code; Psilocyn; Tetrahydrocannabinols; synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic substances, immediate derivatives and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity including, but not limited to the following: delta-1 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; delta-6 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; delta-3,4 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers; delta-8 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; and delta-10 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered.) Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol-O (delta-8-THC-0), Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC-0) and Synthetic and non-naturally occurring cannabinoids. The provisions of this section related to tetrahydrocannabinols are inapplicable to products or substances lawfully manufactured, distributed, or possessed under the provisions of §19-12E-1 et seq. and chapter 16H of this code. Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE; Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP; Thiophene analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine; TPCP, TCP; 1[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrroldine; some other names: TCPy; 4-methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone); 3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-D); 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-C); 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-I); 2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-2); 2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-4); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-H); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (2C-N); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-P); 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone (Methylone); 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propyltghiophenethylamine (2C-T-7, itsoptical isomers, salts and salts of isomers; 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine some trade or other names: 5-methoxy-3-[2-(dimethylamino)ethyl]indole; 5-MeO-DMT(5-MeO-DMT); Alpha-methyltryptamine (other name: AMT); 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (other name: 5-MeO-DIPT); Synthetic Cannabinoids as follows: 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol) { also known as CP 47,497 and homologues} ; rel-2-[(1S,3R)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl] -5-(2-methylnonan-2-yl)phenol { also known as CP 47,497-C8 homolog} ; [(6aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6, 6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a, 7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol)] { also known as HU-210} ; (dexanabinol); (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzol[c]chromen-1-ol) { also known as HU-211} ; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole { also known as JWH-018} ; 1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole { also known as JWH-073} ; (2-methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-napthalenyl-methanone { also known as JWH-015} ; (1-hexyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-naphthalenyl-methanone { also known as JWH-019} ; [1-[2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl] -1H-indol-3-yl]-1-naphthalenyl-methanone { also known as JWH-200} ; 1-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-2-(3-hydroxyphenyl)-ethanone { also known as JWH-250} ; 2-((1S,2S,5S)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-hydroxtpropyl)cyclohexyl) -5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol {also known as CP 55,940} ; (4-methyl-1-naphthalenyl) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-methanone { also known as JWH-122};(4-methyl-1-naphthalenyl) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-methanone { also known as JWH-398;(4-methoxyphenyl)(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone { also known as RCS-4} ;1-(1-(2-cyclohexylethyl) -1H-indol-3-yl) -2-(2-methoxyphenyl) ethanone { also known as RCS-8} ;1-pentyl-3-[1-(4-methoxynaphthoyl)]indole (JWH-081);1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM2201); and1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM694).Synthetic cannabinoids:CP 47,497 AND homologues, 2-[(1R,3S)-3-Hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-YL)phenol);HU-210, [(6AR,10AR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-Methyloctan-2-YL)-6A,7,10, 10A-tetrahydrobenzo[C] chromen-1-OL)];HU-211, (dexanabinol, (6AS,10AS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-Dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-YL)-6A,7,10,10atetrahydrobenzo[ C]chromen-1-OL);JWH-018, 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;JWH-019, 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;JWH-073, 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;JWH-200, (1-(2-morpholin-4-ylethyl)indol-3-yl)- Naphthalen-1-ylmethanone;JWH-250, 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole.]Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-ADB);Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate (5F-AMB);Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate (FUB-AMB);N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-APINACA);N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-FUBINACA);Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-CHMICA);Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-FUBINACA);Tetrahydrocannabinols:DELTA-1 CIS OR trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers.DELTA-6 CIS OR trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers.DELTA-3,4 CIS or their trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers.Synthetic Phenethylamines2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25I-NBOMe/ 2C-I-NBOMe);2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25C-NBOMe/2C-C-NBOMe);2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25B-NBOMe/ 2C-B-NBOMe);Synthetic Opioids (including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers):N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (acetyl fentanyl);furanyl fentanyl;3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide (also known as U-47700);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide, also known as N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide, (butyryl fentanyl);N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethylpiperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide, also known as N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide, (beta-hydroxythiofentanyl);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide (acryl fentanyl);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide (isobutyryl fentanyl);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide (cyclopropyl fentanyl);2-(2,4-dichlorophenyl)-N-((1S,2S)-2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl)-N-methylacetamide (also known as U-48800);Trans-3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(diethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl-benzamide (also known as U-49900);Trans-3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl-benzeneacetamide (also known as U-51754);2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine (butonitazene);2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine (etodesnitazene);N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (flunitazene);N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metodesnitazene);N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metonitaze); 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)5-nitro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1 H-benzimidazole (N-pyrrolidino etonitazene, etonitazepyne);N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (protonitazene);N-pyrrolidino etonitazene;Etodesnitazene;Isotonitazene;Protonitazene;Metonitazene;Butonitazene;Metodesnitazene;Flunitazene;Opioid Receptor Agonist2-Methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one)AH-7921 (3,4-dichloro-N-(1dimethylamino)cyclohexylmethyl]benzamide).Naphthoylindoles or any compound containing a 3-(-1-Napthoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:JWH 015;JWH 018;JWH 019;JWH 073;JWH 081;JWH 122;JWH 200;JWH 210;JWH 398;AM 2201; andWIN 55,212.Naphylmethylindoles or any compound containing a 1hindol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl) methane structure with a substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include, but not be limited to, JWH 175 and JWH 184.Naphthoylpyrroles or any compound containing a 3-(1- Naphthoyl) pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring whether or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include, but not be limited to, JWH 147 and JWH 307.Naphthylmethylindenes or any compound containing a Naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3- Position of the indene ring whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include, but not be limited to, JWH 176.Phenylacetylindoles or any compound containing a 3- Phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:RCS-8, SR-18 OR BTM-8;JWH 250;JWH 203;JWH 251; andJWH 302.Cyclohexylphenols or any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl) phenol structure with a substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:CP 47,497 and its homologues and analogs;Cannabicyclohexanol; andCP 55,940.Benzoylindoles or any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogren atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:AM 694;Pravadoline WIN 48,098;RCS 4; andAM 679.[2,3-dihydro-5 methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo [1,2,3-DE]-1, 4-benzoxazin-6-YL]-1-napthalenymethanone. This shall include WIN 55,212-2.Dibenzopyrans or any compound containing a 11-hydroxydelta 8-tetrahydrocannabinol structure with substitution on the 3-pentyl group. This shall include HU-210, HU-211, JWH 051, and JWH 133.Adamantoylindoles or any compound containing a 3-(-1-Adamantoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the adamantoyl ring system to any extent. This shall include AM1248.Tetramethylcyclopropylindoles or any compound containing A 3-tetramethylcyclopropylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any extent. This shall include UR-144 and XLR-11.N-(1-Adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1h-indazole-3-carboxamide. This shall include AKB48.Any other synthetic chemical compound that is a cannabinoid receptor type 1 agonist as demonstrated by binding studies and functional assays that is not listed in Schedules II, III, IV, and V, not federal Food and Drug Administration-approved drug or used within legitimate, approved medical research. Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, any immediate precursor or immediate derivative of these substances shall be covered.Tryptamines:5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-MiPT);4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-HO-DiPT);4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (4-HO-MiPT);4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (4-HO-MET);4-acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-AcO-DiPT);5-methoxy-α-methyltryptamine (5-MeO-AMT);4-methoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine (4-MeO-DMT);4-hydroxy Diethyltryptamine (4-HO-DET);5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine (5-MeO-DALT);4-acetoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine (4-AcO DMT);4-hydroxy Diethyltryptamine (4-HO-DET);FDU-PB-22 (1-Naphthyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);FUB-PB-22 (Quinolin-8-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);5-Fluoro-MN-24 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);MN-24 (N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);SDB-005 (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxylate);SDB-006 (1-Pentyl-N-(phenylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);Methyl-Ethylaminopentiophenone;FUB-AMB (Methyl(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carbonyl)-L-valinate);5-Fluoro-SDB-005 Indole (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);5F-AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide);MMB-CHMICA (Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoat);MN-24 (N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);SDB-005 (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxylate);SDB-006 (1-Pentyl-N-(phenylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);Ethcathinone (2-(ethylamino)-1-phenyl-1-propanone, monohydrochloride);Methyl-Ethylaminopentiophenone;FUB-AMB (Methyl(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carbonyl)-L-valinate);5-Fluoro-SDB-005 Indole (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);5F-AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide);MMB-CHMICA (Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoat);Bromazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Clonazolam (6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4 H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Cloniprazepam (5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-(cyclopropylmethyl)-1,3-dihydro-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Etizolam (4-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-ethyl-9-methyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f] [1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);Flualprazolam (8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flubromazepam (7-bromo-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Flubromazolam (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flunitrazolam (6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);Nifoxipam (5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-3-hydroxy-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one) ;Nitrazolam (1-methyl-8-nitro-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine); andPyrazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-(2-pyridinyl)-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine).(e) Depressants.4-CN-CUMYL-BUTINACA (1-(4-Cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide);Alpha-Phenylacetoacetonitrile (3-Oxo-2-phenylbutanenitrile);2-Fluoro Deschloroketamine (2-(2-Fluorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone, monohydrochloride);4-MEAP (2-(Ethylamino)-1-(4-methylphenyl)pentan-1-one);Mecloqualone;Methaqualone;Bromazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Clonazolam (6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4 H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3 a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Cloniprazepam (5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-(cyclopropylmethyl)-1,3-dihydro-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Etizolam (4-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-ethyl-9-methyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f] [1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);Flualprazolam (8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flubromazepam (7-bromo-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Flubromazolam (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flunitrazolam (6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (some other names include GHB; gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);Nifoxipam (5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-3-hydroxy-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Nitrazolam (1-methyl-8-nitro-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Pyrazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-(2-pyridinyl)-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Diclazepam (7-Chloro-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one); andDeschloroetizolam (2-Ethyl-9-methyl-4-phenyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine); (f) Stimulants. Aminorex; some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5- phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine;4,4'-Dimethylaminorex (4,4′-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol-2-amine); Cathinone; some trade or other names: 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;Ethylphenidate (ethyl 2-phenyl-2-(piperidin-2-yl)acetate); Fenethylline; Mesocarb (N-phenyl-N ′-(3-(1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3-ium-5-yl)carbamimidate); Methcathinone, its immediate precursors and immediate derivatives, its salts, optical isomers and salts of optical isomers; some other names: (2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha- (methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; 3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone and/or mephedrone;3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MPVD); ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432; (+-) cis-4-methylaminorex; ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine); N-ethylamphetamine; N,N-dimethylamphetemine; also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine; Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, also known as alpha-PVP, optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers;Substituted amphetamines:2-Fluoroamphetamine;3-Fluoroamphetamine;4-Fluoroamphetamine;2-chloroamphetamine;3-chloroamphetamine;4-chloroamphetamine;2-Fluoromethamphetamine;3-Fluoromethamphetamine;4-Fluoromethamphetamine;4-chloromethamphetamine;Ethcathinone (2-(ethylamino)-1-phenyl-1-propanone, monohydrochloride);Alpha-PHP (1-Phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);MPHP (1-(4-Methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);PV8 (1-Phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one);4-Chloro-Alpha-PVP (1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one);N-Ethylhexedrone (2-(Ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one);Methoxetamine (2-(Ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)-cyclohexanone); and3-Fluorophenmetrazine (2-(3-Fluorophenyl)-3-methylmorpholine);(g) Temporary listing of substances subject to emergency scheduling. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (benzylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;N-[1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers.N-benzylpiperazine, also known as BZP;Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide);4-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-butyramide);Isobutyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-propanamide);Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-acetamide);3-methylbutyryl fentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylbutyramide);4-methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide);Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-acetamide);Tetrahydrofuran fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide); andValeryl fentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]pentanamide).(h) The following controlled substances are included in Schedule I:Synthetic Cathinones or any compound, except bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule, or compounds used within legitimate and approved medical research, structurally derived from 2-Aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with Monocyclic or fused polycyclic ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:By substitution in the ring system to any extent with Alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one or more other univalent substituents; By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent; By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl or methoxybenzyl groups; By inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure; or Any other synthetic chemical compound that is a cannabinoid receptor type 1 agonist as demonstrated by binding studies and functional assays that is not listed in Schedules II, III, IV, and V, not federal Food and Drug Administration-approved drug or used within legitimate, approved medical research.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home